Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3525
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Motor Vehicle Service Contract Reimbursement Insurance Act and to establish minimum standards for disclosure of the coverage limitations and exclusions of motor vehicle service contracts.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 97.